Illinois, session 104th, SB3786.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Sections 246, 247, and 248 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Legacy credit.8    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 92026, any sole proprietorship, limited liability company, or 10corporation that is headquartered in the State is entitled to 11a credit against the taxes imposed by subsections (a) and (b) 12of Section 201 in an amount equal to $100 multiplied by the 13number of years during which the taxpayer has been 14headquartered in Illinois as of the last day of the taxable 15year.16    (b) If the taxpayer is a Subchapter S corporation, the 17credit shall be allowed to shareholders in accordance with the 18determination of income and distributive shares of income 19under Subchapter S of Chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code. 20    (c) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 21the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 22the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 23may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the   SB3786- 2 -LRB104 19218 HLH 32663 b15 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax 2credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 3a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 4that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 5shall be applied first. 6    (d) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 7250.  8    (35 ILCS 5/247 new)9    Sec. 247. Employee tax credit. 10    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 112026, any sole proprietorship, limited liability company, or 12corporation that has a business location in the State is 13entitled to a credit against the taxes imposed by subsections 14(a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount equal to $100 for each 15employee who is a resident of the State and is on the 16employer's payroll with 6 or more months of consecutive 17employment with the employer at the end of the taxable year. 18    (b) If the taxpayer is a Subchapter S corporation, the 19credit shall be allowed to shareholders in accordance with the 20determination of income and distributive shares of income 21under Subchapter S of Chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code. 22    (c) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 23the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 24the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 25may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the   SB3786- 3 -LRB104 19218 HLH 32663 b15 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax 2credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 3a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 4that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 5shall be applied first. 6    (d) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 7250.  8    (35 ILCS 5/248 new)9    Sec. 248. Collective bargaining employee tax credit. 10    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 112026, any sole proprietorship, limited liability company, or 12corporation that has a business location in the State is 13entitled to a credit against the taxes imposed by subsections 14(a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount equal to $25 for each 15employee who is a resident of the State, who qualifies under 16the definitions of the National Labor Relations Board, and who 17has 6 or more months of consecutive employment with the 18employer at the end of the taxable year. 19    (b) If the taxpayer is a Subchapter S corporation, the 20credit shall be allowed to shareholders in accordance with the 21determination of income and distributive shares of income 22under Subchapter S of Chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code. 23    (c) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 24the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 25the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess   SB3786- 4 -LRB104 19218 HLH 32663 b1may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 25 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax 3credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 4a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 5that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 6shall be applied first. 7    (d) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 8250.  9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.